Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 3. Discipline.
§ 22.1-279.8.
School safety audits and school crisis, emergency management, and medical emergency response plans required.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

“School crisis, emergency management, and medical emergency response plan”
means the essential procedures, operations, and assignments required to prevent, manage, and respond to a critical event or emergency, including natural disasters involving fire, flood, tornadoes, or other severe weather; loss or disruption of power, water, communications or shelter; bus or other accidents; medical emergencies, including cardiac arrest and other life-threatening medical emergencies; student or staff member deaths; explosions; bomb threats; gun, knife or other weapons threats; spills or exposures to hazardous substances; the presence of unauthorized persons or trespassers; the loss, disappearance or kidnapping of a student; hostage situations; violence on school property or at school activities; incidents involving acts of terrorism; and other incidents posing a serious threat of harm to students, personnel, or facilities. The plan shall include a provision that the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund shall be contacted immediately to deploy assistance in the event of an emergency as defined in the emergency response plan when there are victims as defined in §

19.2-11.01

. The Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund shall be the lead coordinating agencies for those individuals determined to be victims, and the plan shall also contain current contact information for both agencies.

“School safety audit”
means a written assessment of the safety conditions in each public school to (i) identify and, if necessary, develop solutions for physical safety concerns, including building security issues, and (ii) identify and evaluate any patterns of student safety concerns occurring on school property or at school-sponsored events. Solutions and responses shall include recommendations for structural adjustments, changes in school safety procedures, and revisions to the school board’s standards for student conduct.

The Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety, in consultation with the Department of Education, shall develop a list of items to be reviewed and evaluated in the school safety audits required by this section. Such items shall include those incidents reported to school authorities pursuant to § 22.1-279.3:1 and shall include a school inspection walk-through using a standardized checklist provided by the Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety, which shall incorporate crime prevention through environmental design principles.

The Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety shall prescribe a standardized report format for school safety audits, additional reporting criteria, and procedures for report submission, which may include instructions for electronic submission.

Each local school board shall require all schools under its supervisory control to annually conduct school safety audits, as defined in this section, consistent with such list and in collaboration with the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality or his designee. As part of each such audit, the school board shall create a detailed and accurate floor plan for each public school building in the local school division or shall certify that the existing floor plan for each such school is sufficiently detailed and accurate.

The results of such school safety audits shall be made public within 90 days of completion pursuant to this subsection. The local school board shall retain authority to withhold or limit the release of any security plans, walk-through checklists, floor plans, and specific vulnerability assessment components as provided in subdivision 4 of §

2.2-3705.2

. The completed walk-through checklist shall be made available to the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality or his designee. Each school shall maintain a copy of the school safety audit, which may exclude such security plans, walk-through checklists, and vulnerability assessment components, within the office of the school principal and shall make a copy of such report available for review upon written request.

Each school shall submit a copy of its school safety audit to the relevant school division superintendent. The division superintendent shall collate and submit all such school safety audits, in the prescribed format and manner of submission, to the Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety and shall make available to the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality the results of such audits for his review and recommendations.

The division superintendent shall establish a school safety audit committee to include, if available, representatives of parents, teachers, local law-enforcement, emergency services agencies, local community services boards, and judicial and public safety personnel. The school safety audit committee shall review the completed school safety audits and submit any plans, as needed, for improving school safety to the division superintendent for submission to the local school board.

Each school board shall ensure that every school that it supervises shall develop a written school crisis, emergency management, and medical emergency response plan, consistent with the definition provided in this section, and shall include the chief law-enforcement officer, the fire chief, the chief of the emergency medical services agency, the executive director of the relevant regional emergency medical services council, and the emergency management official of the locality, or their designees, in the development of such plans. Each school division shall designate an emergency manager. The Department of Education and the Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety shall provide technical assistance to the school divisions of the Commonwealth in the development of the school crisis, emergency management, and medical emergency response plans that describe the components of a medical emergency response plan developed in coordination with local emergency medical services providers, the training of school personnel and students to respond to a life-threatening emergency, and the equipment required for this emergency response. The local school board, the chief law-enforcement officer, the fire chief, the chief of the emergency medical services agency, the executive director of the relevant regional emergency medical services council, and the emergency management official of the locality, or their designees, shall annually review the written school crisis, emergency management, and medical emergency response plans. The local school board shall have the authority to withhold or limit the review of any security plans and specific vulnerability assessment components as provided in subdivision 4 of §

2.2-3705.2

. The local school division superintendent shall certify this review in writing to the Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety no later than August 31 of each year.

Upon consultation with local school boards, division superintendents, the Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety, and the Coordinator of Emergency Management, the Board of Education shall develop, and may revise as it deems necessary, a model school crisis, emergency management, and medical emergency response plan for the purpose of assisting the public schools in Virginia in developing viable, effective crisis, emergency management, and medical emergency response plans. Such model shall set forth recommended effective procedures and means by which parents can contact the relevant school or school division regarding the location and safety of their school children and by which school officials may contact parents, with parental approval, during a critical event or emergency.

Each school board shall ensure that every public school it supervises employs at least one school administrator who has completed, either in-person or online, school safety training for public school personnel conducted by the Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety in accordance with subdivision A 1 of §

9.1-184

. However, such requirement shall not apply if such required training is not available online.

History.

1997, c. 593; 1999, cc. 475, 516, § 22.1-278.1; 2001, cc. 436, 440, 688, 820, 841; 2002, cc. 166, 221, 229, 235; 2003, c. 801; 2004, c. 690; 2005, c. 904; 2006, c. 43; 2007, c. 44; 2009, cc. 222, 269; 2012, c. 418; 2013, c. 609; 2014, cc. 7, 158; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2017, c. 778; 2019, cc. 141, 410, 487, 488; 2020, c. 338; 2022, cc. 21, 22, 57.

Cross references.

As to Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety, see §

9.1-184

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 436, 440, and 841 amended § 22.1-278.1, which was repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 688 and 820. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendments have been implemented in this section, the comparable new provision enacted by Acts 2001, cc. 688, 820.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 436 and 440 are identical, and added the second paragraph in subsection B, and inserted “and the Virginia Center for School Safety” in the second sentence of subsection D.

The 2001 amendment by c. 841 inserted “tornadoes, or other” preceding “severe weather” in subsection A, and in the second paragraph of subsection D deleted “and” preceding “division superintendents” and inserted “the Virginia Center for School Safety, and the Coordinator of Emergency Management.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 166 and 235 are virtually identical, and inserted “incidents involving acts of terrorism” in the last sentence of the definition of “School crisis and emergency management plan” in subsection A.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 221 and 229 are identical, and added the last sentence of the second paragraph of subsection D.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 801, in subsection A, substituted “responses shall include” for “responses may include” in the second sentence of the paragraph defining “School safety audit”; and in subsection B, inserted “annually” in the second sentence of the first paragraph, added the first sentence of the second paragraph, and inserted “which may exclude such security plans and vulnerability assessment components” in the second sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 690 substituted “subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705

.2” for “§

2.2-3705

” in the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 904, in subsection B, in the first paragraph, substituted “Virginia Center for School Safety” for “Superintendent of Public Instruction” in the first sentence and added the last sentence, added the present second paragraph, and inserted “in the prescribed format and manner of submission” in the last sentence of the concluding paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 43, in the first paragraph of subsection A, deleted “and” following “School crisis,” and inserted “and medical response” and “including cardiac arrest and other life-threatening medical emergencies”; in subsection D, in the first and second sentences of the first paragraph, deleted “and” following “school crisis” and inserted “and medical emergency response,” in the second sentence inserted “(i)” and added the language beginning “that describe the components” at the end, and in the second paragraph, deleted “and” following “school crisis” and inserted “and emergency medical response” twice.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 44 added the last three sentences in subsection D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 222 and 269 are identical, and added the last sentence of the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 418, in the paragraph defining “School crisis, emergency management, and medical emergency response plan,” divided the former last sentence into two sentences by substituting “defined in §

19.2-11.01

. The Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund shall be the lead coordinating agencies for those individuals determined to be victims, and the plan shall also contain current contact information for both agencies” for “defined in §

19.2-11.01

, as well as current contact information for both.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 609, in subsection B, in the first paragraph inserted “in consultation with the Department of Education” in the first sentence, and “and shall include a school inspection walk-through using a standardized checklist provided by the Virginia Center for School Safety, which shall incorporate crime prevention through environmental design principles” in the last sentence, in the last paragraph, inserted “walk-through checklists” in the second and last sentences, inserted the third sentence, and added “and shall make available upon request to the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality the results of such audits” at the end of the last sentence of the last paragraph; rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “The school board may establish a school safety audit committee to consist of representatives of parents, teachers, local law-enforcement agencies, judicial and public safety personnel, and the community at large. The school safety audit committee shall evaluate, in accordance with the directions of the local school board, the safety of each school and submit a plan for improving school safety at a public meeting of the local school board”; and in subsection D, added “and shall provide copies of such plans to the chief law-enforcement officer, the fire chief, the chief emergency medical services official, and the emergency management official of the locality” at the end of the first sentence, and inserted the second sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 7 and 158 are identical, and substituted “Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety” for “Virginia Center for School Safety” throughout and deleted “on” in last sentence of subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “chief of the emergency medical services agency” for “chief emergency medical services official” in the first sentence of subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 4 of §

2.2-3705.2

” for “subdivision 7
of §

2.2-3705.2

” in subsections B and D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 141 and 410 are identical, and in subsection D, substituted “include” for “provide copies of such plans to,” inserted “the executive director of the relevant regional emergency medical services council” and “or their designees, in the development of such plans” in the first sentence and inserted “and the chief law-enforcement officer, the fire chief, the chief of the emergency medical services agency, the executive director of the relevant regional emergency medical services council, and the emergency management official of the locality, or their designees” in the fourth sentence.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 487 and 488 are identical, and added subsection E.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 338 deleted “and” following “local school board” in the fourth sentence of subsection D.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 21 and 22 are identical, and in subsection B in the third paragraph, substituted “as defined in this section, consistent with such list and in collaboration with the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality or his designee” for “as defined in this section and consistent with such list”; in the fourth paragraph, inserted “pursuant to this subsection” and deleted “upon request” following “made available”; and in the fifth paragraph, deleted “upon request” following “make available” and added “for his review and recommendations” at the end of the paragraph.

The 2022 amendment by c. 57 added the second sentence in subsection B in the third paragraph.

Law Review.

For article, “From Animal Control to Zoning: 2019 Local Government Law Update,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 205 (2019).

§ 22.1-279.9.
Development of programs to prevent crime and violence.

All school boards shall develop, in cooperation with the local law-enforcement agencies, juvenile and domestic relations court judges and personnel, parents, and the community at large, programs to prevent violence and crime on school property and at school-sponsored events, which shall include prevention of hazing. Activities designed to prevent the recurrence of violence and crime, including hazing, may include such interventions as education relating to Virginia’s criminal law, school crime lines, peer mediation, conflict resolution, community service requirements, and any program focused on demonstrating the consequences of violence and crime. School boards are encouraged to develop and use a network of volunteer services in implementing these prevention activities.

History.

2001, cc. 688, 820; 2004, c. 574.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 574 added “which shall include prevention of hazing” at the end of the first sentence and in the next-to-last sentence, inserted “including hazing” and “education relating to Virginia’s criminal law.”

§ 22.1-279.10.
School resource officers; data.

The Department of Criminal Justice Services, in coordination with the Department of Education and the Department of Juvenile Justice, shall annually collect, report, and publish on its website data on the use of force against students, including the use of chemical, mechanical, or other restraints and instances of seclusion; detentions of students; arrests of students; student referrals to court or court service units; and other disciplinary actions by school resource officers involving students. Such data shall (i) be published in a manner that protects the identities of students and (ii) be disaggregated by local school division and by student age, grade, race, ethnicity, gender, and disability, if such data is available.

History.

2020, cc. 169, 1039.

§ 22.1-280.
Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 287.

Cross references.

For section prohibiting corporal punishment, see § 22.1-279.1.

§ 22.1-280.1.
Repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 688 and 820, cl. 2.

Cross references.

Former § 22.1-280.1, requiring reports of certain acts to school authorities was derived from Acts 1981, c. 189; 1990, cc. 517, 797; 1991, c. 295; 1994, cc. 265, 285; 1995, cc. 759, 773; 1996, cc. 916, 964; 1999, c. 970; 2000, cc. 79, 611.

§ 22.1-280.2.
School crime line defined; development of school crime lines authorized; local school boards’ authority; Board to promulgate regulations.

As used in this section, “school crime line” means a confidential, anonymous system providing inducements for students to report any unlawful act occurring in school buildings or on school grounds or during school-sponsored activities to local law-enforcement authorities that is established as a cooperative alliance between the local school board, news media, the community, and law-enforcement officials or through a separate, nonprofit corporation governed by a board of directors or as part of a local “Crime Stoppers program.

In order to reduce crime and violence within the school divisions in the Commonwealth, any local school board may develop a school crime line program as a joint, self-sustaining, cooperative alliance with news media, the community, and law-enforcement authorities to receive, screen, and reward student reports of unlawful acts committed in school buildings or on school grounds or at school functions, when such reports lead to arrests or recovery of contraband or stolen property. Police or other law-enforcement personnel shall staff every school crime line program, receive reported information from anonymous student callers, screen such information, and direct information for further investigation, as may be appropriate.

Such programs may be established (i) by a local school board as a joint, self-sustaining, cooperative alliance with news media, the community, and law-enforcement authorities; (ii) through a separate nonprofit corporation initiated jointly by the local school board, news media, the community, and law-enforcement authorities and governed by a board of directors; or (iii) as part of a local “Crime Stoppers” program.

The governing board of any separate nonprofit school crime line corporation shall include broad-based community representation and shall, through its bylaws, set the policy, coordinate fund raising, and formulate a system of rewards. Prior to implementation of any school crime line program and annually thereafter, the local school board shall review and approve, as complying with the Board’s regulations for implementation of school crime lines, its regulations or the bylaws of any nonprofit school crime line corporation or the bylaws of any nonprofit “Crime Stoppers” corporation operating a school crime line. No school crime line program shall be implemented or revised without first obtaining the local school board’s approval. Every local school board developing a school crime line program shall also notify all students and their parents or other custodian of the procedures and policies governing the program prior to implementation and annually thereafter.

The Board shall promulgate regulations for the implementation of school crime lines, including appropriate fund raising, and the appropriateness of and limitations on rewards. In developing the regulations, the Board shall, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, address issues relating to civil rights, privacy, and any other question of law, including the civic duty to report crime without compensation.

Local school boards may establish, as a separate account, a school crime line fund, consisting of private contributions, local appropriations specifically designated for such purposes, and such funds as may be appropriated for this purpose by the Commonwealth pursuant to the appropriation act. No state or local funds appropriated for educational purposes shall be used to implement a school crime line.

History.

1993, c. 361; 1994, c. 721; 2022, c. 355.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 substituted “Board’s” for “Board of Education’s” in subsection C in the second paragraph; in subsection D, substituted “The Board” for “By July 1, 1994, the Board of Education” and deleted “but not limited to” preceding “appropriate fund raising”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-280.2:1.
Employment of school security officers.

Local school boards and private or religious schools may employ school security officers, as defined in §

9.1-101

, for the purposes set forth therein. Such school security officer may carry a firearm in the performance of his duties if (i) within 10 years immediately prior to being hired by the local school board or private or religious school he (a) was an active law-enforcement officer as defined in §

9.1-101

in the Commonwealth or (b) was employed by a law-enforcement agency of the United States or any state or political subdivision thereof and his duties were substantially similar to those of a law-enforcement officer as defined in § 9.1-101; (ii) he retired or resigned from his position as a law-enforcement officer in good standing; (iii) he meets the training and qualifications described in subsection C of §

18.2-308.016

; (iv) he has provided proof of completion of a training course that includes training in active shooter emergency response, emergency evacuation procedure, and threat assessment to the Department of Criminal Justice Services pursuant to subdivision 42 of §

9.1-102

, provided that if he received such training from a local law-enforcement agency he received the training in the locality in which he is employed; (v) the local school board or private or religious school solicits input from the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality regarding the qualifications of the school security officer and receives verification from such chief law-enforcement officer that the school security officer is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, purchasing, or transporting a firearm; and (vi) the local school board or private or religious school grants him the authority to carry a firearm in the performance of his duties.

History.

2002, cc. 836, 868; 2017, c. 311; 2019, cc. 120, 493.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 311 added the second sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 120 inserted “and private or religious schools” and three times inserted “or private or religious school.”

The 2019 amendment by c. 493 inserted “(a)” and “or (b) was employed by a law-enforcement agency of the United States or any state or political subdivision thereof and his duties were substantially similar to those of a law-enforcement officer as defined in §

9.1-101

.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

School safety. —

Virginia law authorizes school resource officers and certain school security officers to possess firearms on public school grounds as school safety personnel, but such authority is not extended to teachers and administrators.
See opinion of Attorney General to Ms. Shannon Dion, Director, Virginia Department of Criminal Justice Services, 18-042,
(8/28/2018).

§ 22.1-280.2:2.
Public School Security Equipment Grant Act of 2013.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Public School Security Equipment Grant Act of 2013.”

For purposes of this section:

“Authority”
means the Virginia Public School Authority.

“Eligible school division”
means a (i) local school division or (ii) regional vocational center, special education center, alternative education center, or academic year Governor’s School serving public school students in grades K through 12. “Eligible school division” includes the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind.

“Local school division”
means a school division with schools subject to state accreditation and whose students are required to be reported in fall membership for grades K through 12.

“Security equipment”
includes building modifications and fixtures, including security vestibules, vaping detectors, security-related devices located outside of the school building on school property, and security-related devices located on school buses.

The Authority shall issue bonds for the purpose of grant payments to eligible school divisions of the Commonwealth to be used exclusively for purchasing security equipment for schools, including any related installation, that is designed to improve and help ensure the safety of students attending public schools in the Commonwealth. Such grants shall not be used to pay for security equipment that is not included or described in a grant application approved by the Department pursuant to subsection D. The amount of grants provided to each eligible school division pursuant to this section shall not exceed $100,000 for each fiscal year of the Commonwealth. Funds for the payment of such grants shall be provided from the issuance of bonds by the Authority, provided that the Authority shall not issue more than an aggregate of $6 million in bonds, after all costs, for such grants during each fiscal year of the Commonwealth. In addition, the Authority shall ensure that no more than an aggregate principal amount of $30 million in bonds issued under this section shall be outstanding at any time. Eligible school divisions seeking a grant shall apply to the Department, which shall be responsible for administering the grant program.

The Authority shall work with the Department to determine the schedule for the issuance of the bonds, which shall be based in part upon eligible school divisions having sufficient funds to purchase such security equipment. The payment of debt service on such bonds shall be as provided in the general appropriation act.

Such grants shall be in addition to all other grants made to local governments, school boards, or school divisions according to law. In addition, such grants shall not replace or be in lieu of loans to local school boards or interest rate subsidy payments to local school boards pursuant to Chapter 11.1 (§ 22.1-175.1 et seq.), and the issuance of such bonds and the payment of such grants shall not, except as herein provided, affect or otherwise amend the provisions of such chapter as they relate to the powers and duties of the Authority, local school boards, local governments, or any other entity.

Based on the criteria developed by the Department in collaboration with the Department of Criminal Justice Services, eligible school divisions shall apply for a grant by August 1 of each year. As a condition of receiving a grant, a local match of 25 percent of the grant amount shall be required. The Superintendent is authorized to reduce the local match for local school divisions with a composite index of local ability-to-pay less than 0.2000, including any such school division participating in a regional vocational center, special education center, alternative education center, or academic year Governor’s School. The Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind shall be exempt from the match requirement.

Grants shall be awarded by the Department on a competitive basis. As part of the application for a grant, each eligible school division shall (i) identify with specificity the security equipment for which grants are being sought, as well as the estimated costs to purchase and install the security equipment, and (ii) certify that it is the intent of the eligible school division to purchase the security equipment within six months of approval of any grant by the Department.

If the Department determines that a grant shall be paid to an eligible school division under this section, it shall provide a written certification to the chairman of the Authority directing him to make a grant payment in a specific amount to the eligible school division. The Department, however, shall not make such written certification until it has established that the Authority has sufficient funds to make such grant payment. The Authority shall only make grant payments to an eligible school division for the grants provided under this section upon receipt of such written certification. The Authority shall make such grant payments, and in the amounts as directed by the Department, within 30 days of receipt of the certification.

The Department shall develop guidelines concerning the requirements for applying for a grant and the administration of such grants. Such guidelines shall not be subject to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

In the event that two or more local school divisions became one local school division, whether by consolidation of only the local school divisions or by consolidation of the local governments, such resulting local school division shall be eligible for grants on the basis of the same number of local school divisions as existed prior to September 30, 2012.

The Authority shall take all necessary and proper steps as it is authorized to take under law to carry out the provisions of this section.

The Department shall make an annual report to the General Assembly by September 1 of each year reporting (i) the total grants paid during the immediately prior fiscal year to each eligible school division and (ii) a general description of the security equipment purchased by eligible school divisions.

History.

2013, c. 608; 2019, c. 231; 2020, cc. 686, 778; 2022, c. 355.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 608 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2013, c. 608, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed by the 2013 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.” Funding was provided by Item 139 C 13 of Acts 2012, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3, as added by Acts 2013, c. 806.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 231 added the definition of
“Security equipment” in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 686, in subsection B in the definition for “Security equipment,” substituted “building modifications and fixtures, including security vestibules, and vaping detectors” for “building modifications and fixtures such as security vestibules.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 778 added “security-related devices located outside of the school building on school property, and security-related devices located on school buses” in subsection B in the definition for “Security equipment.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in subsection B, deleted the former definition: “‘Department’ means the Department of Education”; substituted “‘Eligible school division’ includes” for “The term shall also include” in the definition of “Eligible school division”; in subsection C, substituted “in the Commonwealth” for “in Virginia” in the first paragraph and deleted “of Title 22.1” following “Chapter 11.1 (§ 22.1-175.1 et seq.)” in the third paragraph; deleted “of Public Instruction” following “Superintendent” in subsection D in the first paragraph; deleted “Beginning in 2014” in subsection H at the beginning; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-280.2:3.
School boards; safety and security personnel.

The school board in each school division in which the local law-enforcement agency employs school resource officers, as defined in §

9.1-101

, shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with such local law-enforcement agency that sets forth the powers and duties of such school resource officers. The provisions of such memorandum of understanding shall be based on the model memorandum of understanding developed by the Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety pursuant to subdivision A 12 of §

9.1-184

, which may be modified by the parties in accordance with their particular needs. Each such school board and local law-enforcement agency shall review and amend or affirm such memorandum at least once every two years or at any time upon the request of either party. Each school board shall ensure the current division memorandum of understanding is conspicuously published on the division website and provide notice and opportunity for public input during each memorandum of understanding review period.

The chief local law-enforcement officer for any local school division in which a public elementary or secondary school does not employ a school resource officer, as defined in §

9.1-101

, shall designate a law-enforcement officer to receive, either in-person or online, the training set forth in subsection E of § 22.1-279.8. Such officer shall serve as the law-enforcement liaison for the school administrator described in subsection E of § 22.1-279.8 in each public elementary or secondary school that does not employ a school resource officer.

History.

2019, cc. 455, 502; 2020, cc. 52, 171; 2022, c. 769.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 52 and 171 are identical, and substituted “two” for “five” in the penultimate sentence and added the last sentence.

§ 22.1-280.2:4.
School boards; firearms on school property.

No school board may authorize or designate any person to possess a firearm on school property other than those persons expressly authorized by statute.

History.

2020, c. 1037.

§ 22.1-280.3.
Repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 688 and 820, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-280.3, providing guidelines for constitutional compliance relating to student prayer, was enacted by Acts 1994, c. 801.

§ 22.1-280.4.
School board action regarding destruction of property.

A school board may take action against a pupil or the pupil’s parent for any actual loss, breakage, or destruction of or failure to return property, owned by or under the control of the school board, caused or committed by such pupil in pursuit of his studies. Such action may include seeking reimbursement from a pupil or the pupil’s parent for any such loss, breakage, or destruction of or failure to return school property.

History.

2001, cc. 688, 820.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).